Last Updated: October 17, 2023
Welcome to Kumu!
Kumu Privacy Policy (v3.0)
At kumu, as part of our commitment to create a safe space, we are working our best to ensure that your privacy is respected and your Personal Data is protected.
Thus, we want you to take a moment and understand what data we obtain about you and our data privacy practices and policies, so you can make an informed decision and exercise meaningful control over your data.
This Privacy Policy will take effect on 20 Nov 2023. For the old version (v2.0) of the policy click
here
.
HIGHLIGHTS
You should read our Privacy Policy in its entirety, but here are a few key points we hope you will take away:
kumu is accessible to the general public from anywhere in the world except in a few countries where the service is unavailable in order for kumu to comply with the law or its company policy.
When you livestream, create a profile, follow a streamer, give virtual gifts, participate in campaigns or post a clip on kumu that are public or intended to be public in nature, individuals that use kumu will access this information and may have the ability to acquire, use, or reveal such information to others. Furthermore, several of our Services (as defined below) are intended to offer others with information on user behavior, such as virtual gifting or a follow to a streamer. We advise you to keep this in mind when using kumu. However, we also provide non-public communication channels on kumu, such as private streaming and chat.
When you participate in campaigns sponsored by our Business Partners (i.e. any company or individual which transacts business with Kumu, including but not limited to advertisers and merchants), we may share your Personal Data with them in accordance with the terms and conditions of the campaigns. For example, if you participate in DTI (Philippines) registered campaigns of a Business Partner, we may share your information with DTI (Philippines) as part our legal obligation and with the Business Partner as part of our contractual obligation.
When you purchase products from our Business Partners, we may share your Personal Data with them to fulfill your orders and to third party service providers for the delivery of your ordered products.
We collect certain Personal Data (e.g. information regarding the device you’re using, IP address, etc.) from you when you use kumu, even if you’re simply browsing livestreams. We use this information to keep the platform safe and to offer you more relevant content, suggested users and advertisements.
We want to hear from you if you have any concerns regarding this Privacy Policy, how we collect or use your Personal Data, or anything else relating to our policies or practices at kumu. You are welcome to contact us at any time using the contact details set out at the end of the Privacy Policy.
APPLICABILITY +
This Privacy Policy is applicable to the collection and use of Personal Data by KumuMedia International Pte. Ltd. (“kumu,” “we,” “us,” or “our”). It describes kumu’s practices regarding the collection, use, disclosure, sale and other processing of Personal Data when you:
Use kumu products and services (e.g. websites, applications, or services supplied, owned, or operated by kumu) which we refer to collectively in this Privacy Policy as our “Services,” or
Otherwise, communicate with us
Kumu acts as the “controller” of your Personal Data for the activities described in this Privacy Policy. That means kumu is the legal entity deciding why and how your Personal Data is collected and used.
EXTERNAL PARTY SITES
Our Services may contain links to other websites [and apps] that we do not operate, which may have privacy policies that differ from our own. If you click on a third party link, you may be directed to that third party’s website [or app landing page]. We strongly advise you to review the privacy policy of every third party site and/or app that you visit. We have no control over and assume no responsibility for the content, privacy policies or practices of any third party sites, apps or services.
WHAT PERSONAL DATA DO WE COLLECT
CATEGORIES AND SOURCES +
For purposes of this Privacy Policy, “Personal Data” means any data that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household. This implies that Personal Data includes information that directly identifies you, such as your name, as well as information that can reasonably be used to identify you, such as your device number in certain circumstances. Personal data does not include aggregated data (which does not identify a particular individual).
We may collect the following categories of Personal Data from you when you [download our app], create an account, stream through our Services, participate in our campaigns and challenges, post klips, use our chat services, purchase coins and share virtual gifts through our Services, contact us (including via social media), participate in our surveys and events, purchase a product in our kumu shop, or otherwise interact with us by using our Services.
USER-PROVIDED PERSONAL DATA
Personal identifiers.
Name, email address, physical address, phone number, [social media account names], registered devices, gender, in-game username (for gaming tournaments and competitions) and age
Payment Information.
Information about billing address and payment method, such as bank account information, credit, debit, or other payment card information
Transaction Information.
Data about purchases and use of services or transactions facilitated by kumu, including purchases made through the Services
Usage Information.
Audio, videos, images, and other information uploaded, viewed ,shared and downloaded on and from the Services; interactions and exchanges with other users (e.g. chat, stream, etc.)
Government ID Data.
We may request a government-issued ID in some instances, such as for verification of your identity, or as required by law
Other Information You Provide to Us.
The content of your kumu correspondence, including exchanges with our customer support (including social media)
Inferences Drawn From your Data.
Inferences we make based upon your interests and viewing preferences
SENSITIVE INFORMATION
Sensitive Personal information are those personal data revealing racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs; trade-union membership; genetic data, biometric data processed solely to identify a human being; health-related data; data concerning a person’s sex life or sexual orientation.
When necessary, with your consent or as otherwise permitted by applicable law, we may also process the following categories of sensitive information:
financial data
biometric data
social security numbers or other government identifiers
PAYMENT DATA
We may collect data necessary to process your payment if you make purchases, such as your payment instrument number, and the security code associated with your payment instrument.
SOCIAL MEDIA LOG-IN DATA
We may provide you with the option to register with us using your existing social media account details, like your Facebook, Twitter, or other social media account. If you choose to register this way, we will collect the information described herein.
APPLICATION DATA
When you use our mobile application(s), we may also collect the following information if you choose to provide us access and permission:
Geolocation Information.
We may request access or permission to track location-based information from your mobile device, either continuously or while you are using our mobile application(s), to provide certain location-based services. If you wish to change our access or permissions, you may do so in your device’s settings.
Mobile Device Access.
We may request access or permission to certain features from your mobile device, including your mobile device’s camera,contacts, microphone, bluetooth, calendar, reminders, sms messages, social media accounts, storage, and other features. If you wish to change our accessor permissions, you may do so in your device’s settings.
Push Notifications.
We may request to send you push notifications regarding your account or certain features of the application(s). If you wish to opt out from receiving these types of communications, you may turn them off in your device’s settings.
The above information is primarily needed to maintain the security and operation of our application(s), for troubleshooting, and for our internal analytics, and reporting purposes.
AUTOMATICALLY-COLLECTED DATA
When you use our Services, we use cookies and other technologies to automatically collect, record, store and otherwise process the following types of Personal Data:
Usage Data.
Data about your activities on and use of our Services, such as app launches inside our Services, browser history, product engagement, IP address or other unique identifiers, and other information regarding your interaction with our Services and our advertisements
Device Information.
Data that can be used to identify your device, such as the device ID, or information about the device, such as the browser type
We use Google Analytics to evaluate the use of our website. Google Analytics uses cookies and other identifiers to collect information, such as how often users visit a website, what pages they visit when they do so, and what other websites they visited prior to visiting a website. To learn more about how Google Analytics collects Personal Data, review
Google’s Privacy Policy
.
To learn more about cookies, please check our cookie policy
here
INFORMATION FROM OTHER SOURCES
kumu may receive Personal Data about you from other individuals, from businesses or third parties acting at your direction, from our Business Partners such as social media platforms with which you interact, and from third parties that work with us to provide our products and services and assist us with security and fraud prevention and improving our Services.
For instance, we may acquire your Personal Data from social media networks (such as Facebook). By accessing or connecting our Services through social media, you authorize kumu to collect, retain, and otherwise process such Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Use.
HOW KUMU USES YOUR PERSONAL DATA +
Kumu processes the following types of Personal Data for the following purposes and in reliance on the following legal bases:
Type(s) of Personal Data
Purpose(s) for Processing
Legal Bases for Processing
All types of Personal Data depending on the Service requested
To perform our obligations in the course of or in connection with Services requested by you
To conclude and perform a contract with you (e.g. Terms of Use, Campaigns Terms and Conditions)
Personal Identifier
To enable you to engage with other users.
Usage Information
To allow you to leave comments on content and engage in campaigns or rewards programs
Personal Identifiers
To communicate with you on service-related issues
Personal Identifiers
Government ID Data
Payment Information
Transaction Information
Device Information
Other Information You Provide to Us
To verify your identity and respond to, handle, and process queries, requests, applications, complaints, and feedback from you
Personal Identifiers
Government ID Data
Payment Information
Transaction Information
Device Information
Other Information You Provide to Us
To manage your relationship with us including to provide customer support services
Personal Identifiers
Payment Information
To process payment or credit transactions
To manage your relationship with us including to provide customer support services
Personal Identifiers
To provide you with news, special offers and general information about other goods, services and events
Where required under applicable law, we will ask for and rely on your consent. You can withdraw your consent to the processing at any time but this does not affect the lawfulness of our processing of your personal information based on consent before such withdrawal.
Personal Identifiers
To disclose Personal Data of the winners of DTI registered campaigns to Philippines’ Department of Trade and Industry
To comply with a legal obligation.
Personal Identifiers
Payment Information
Transaction Information
To process your Personal Data in accordance to the regulatory requirements of Anti-Money Laundering Council and Bangko Sentral ng Pilipinas
Personal Identifiers
Device Information
Transaction Information
Usage Data
To access, preserve or disclose personal data in response to a request from a regulator, law enforcement, court or others
Inferences Drawn From Your Data
Usage Information
Usage Data
To improve users’ experience with kumu by providing content recommendations, user suggestions and relevant notification
To pursue our legitimate interests to make your experience of our products and Services efficient and effective
Inferences Drawn From Your Data
Usage Information
Usage Data
To operate, maintain, improve, provide, create, and develop all of the features, functionality, and Services (new and existing) found on kumu
To pursue our legitimate interests to make your experience of our products and Services efficient and effective
Usage Data
Device Information
To provide and increase safety and security for our websites, products, software, or applications and Services (by preventing, detecting and implementing proper measures against spam, scammers, abuse, misuses of our Services and violation of our rules)
To pursue our legitimate interests to ensure our products and Services are safe and secure and to ensure they are used in accordance with our applicable Terms
Usage Data
Device Information
To investigate and address violations of Terms
To detect, prevent and combat unlawful behavior
To pursue our legitimate interests to ensure our products and Services are safe and secure and to ensure they are used in accordance with our applicable Terms
Inferences Drawn From Your Data
Usage Information
Usage Data
Data analysis, identifying usage trends, determining the effectiveness of our promotional campaigns
To pursue our legitimate interests to inform and improve our products and Services
Inferences Drawn From Your Data
Usage Information
Usage Data
Data analysis, identifying usage trends, and introduce marketing campaigns that suits the client’s preferences
To pursue our legitimate interests to inform and improve our products and Services
You have a right to object to the processing of your personal information where that processing is carried out for our legitimate interests. Please note however that we may not be able to fulfill this request in all instances. You are able to request a copy of the legitimate interest assessment carried out by us.
Where we need to collect the above mentioned categories of Personal Data by virtue of a legal obligation or in light of a contract entered or to be entered into with you, and you do not provide this Personal Data when requested, we may not be able to comply with our legal obligations, provide you with a service or perform the contract we have or are trying to enter into with you. In such a case, we may have to terminate our relationship with you.
KUMU’S SHARING OF PERSONAL DATA +
We may disclose your personal information with our service providers pursuant to a written contract between us and each service provider.
We may use your personal information for our own business purposes, such as for undertaking internal research for technological development and demonstration. This is not considered to be “selling” your personal information.
We may share or disclose your Personal Data to the following:
VENDORS, CONSULTANTS & OTHER THIRD-PARTY SERVICE PROVIDERS
We disclose Personal Data to service providers who perform services for us or on our behalf and may require access to such information to do that work. We have contracts in place with our third parties, which are designed to help safeguard your personal information. This means that they cannot do anything with your personal information unless we have instructed them to do it. They will also not share your personal information with any organization apart from us. They also commit to protect the data they hold on our behalf and to retain it for the period we instruct. The categories of third parties we may share personal information with are as follows:
Ad Networks
Affiliate Marketing Programs
Cloud Computing Services
Communication & Collaboration Tools
Data Analytics Services
Data Storage Service Providers
Finance & Accounting Tools
Payment Processors
Performance Monitoring Tools
Product Engineering & Design Tools
Sales & Marketing Tools
Social Networks
Testing Tools
User Account Registration & Authentication Services
Website Hosting Service Providers
BUSINESS TRANSFERS
We may share or transfer your information in connection with, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of company assets, financing,or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
WHEN WE USE GOOGLE MAPS PLATFORM APIs
We may share your information with certain Google Maps Platform APIs (e.g., Google Maps API, Places API).
OTHER USERS
When you share personal information (for example, by posting comments, contributions, or other content to the Services) or otherwise interact with public areas of the app, such personal information may be viewed by all users and may be publicly made available outside the Services in perpetuity. If you interact with other users of our applications and register for our Services through a social network (such as Facebook), your contacts on the social network will see your name, profile photo, and descriptions of your activity. Similarly, other users will be able to view descriptions of your activity,communicate with you within our Services, and view your profile.
BUSINESS PARTNERS
Campaigns, Contests and Gaming Tournament partners.
When you participate in campaigns, challenges and competitions sponsored by our partners, we may disclose your personal data to them in accordance with the terms and conditions of the said campaign, challenge or competition.
We may also share aggregated, anonymized data with our Business Partners and advertising clients, such as user segment statistics.
OFFER WALL
Our application(s) may display a third-party hosted “offer wall.”Such an offer wall allows third-party advertisers to offer virtual currency, gifts,or other items to users in return for the acceptance and completion of an advertisement offer. Such an offer wall may appear in our application(s) and be displayed to you based on certain data, such as your geographic area or demographic information. When you click on an offer wall, you will be brought to an external website belonging to other persons and will leave our application(s). A unique identifier, such as your user ID, will be shared with the offer wall provider in order to prevent fraud and properly credit your account with the relevant reward.
LAW AND PUBLIC INTEREST
We may disclose your Personal Data if we believe it is reasonably necessary to comply with law, regulation, legal process, or governmental requests such as court orders, subpoenas, or warrants in the manner allowed by law.
We may also disclose Personal Data when we believe, in good faith, that disclosure is appropriate or reasonably necessary to protect kumu from fraudulent, abusive, or unlawful uses; to investigate and defend ourselves against third-party claims or allegations; to protect the security or integrity of kumu; or to protect the rights, property, or safety of kumu, our users, or others.
AFFILIATES AND CHANGE OF OWNERSHIP
We may also disclose your Personal Data to kumu affiliates (companies controlled by, controlling, or under common control with kumu) and subsidiaries that are either subject to this Privacy Policy or implement standards that are at least as protective as those specified in this Privacy Policy.
Your Personal Data may also be transferred as part of a bankruptcy, merger, acquisition, reorganization, or sale of kumu assets if we are involved in such a transaction, including any evaluation of such a transaction.
HOW DOES KUMU HANDLE YOUR SOCIAL MEDIA LOGINS? +
Our application(s) offer you the ability to register and log in using your third-party social media account details (like your Facebook or Twitter logins). When you choose to do this, we will receive certain profile information about you from your social media provider. The profile information we receive may vary depending on the social media provider concerned, but will often include your name, email address, friends list, and profile picture, as well as other information you choose to make public on such a social media platform.
We will use the information we receive only for the purposes that are described in this privacy notice or that are otherwise made clear to you on the relevant Services. Please note that we do not control, and are not responsible for, other uses of your personal information by your third-party social media provider. We recommend that you review their privacy notice to understand how they collect, use, and share your personal information, and how you can set your privacy preferences on their sites and apps.
HOW DOES KUMU OPERATE AND TRANSFER PERSONAL DATA GLOBALLY +
Your information, including Personal Data, is processed at kumu’s operating offices and in any other places where the parties involved in the processing are located. It means that this information may be transferred to — and maintained on — computers/servers located outside of your state, province, country or other governmental jurisdiction where the data protection laws may differ from those from your jurisdiction.
kumu will take all steps reasonably necessary to ensure that your data is transferred securely and in accordance with this Privacy Policy, and applicable laws, and no transfer of your Personal Data will take place to an organization or a country unless there are adequate controls in place including with respect to the security of your Personal Data.
HOW LONG KUMU STORES YOUR PERSONAL DATA +
kumu will retain your Personal Data only for as long as is necessary for the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy or as required or permitted by applicable laws. We will retain and use your Personal Data to the extent necessary to comply with our legal obligations (for example, if we are required to retain your data to comply with applicable laws), resolve disputes, and enforce our contractual agreements and policies.
We will cease to retain your Personal Data, or remove the means by which the data can be associated with you, as soon as it is reasonable to assume that such retention no longer serves the purpose for which the Personal Data was collected, and is no longer necessary for legal or business purposes.
HOW KUMU SECURES YOUR PERSONAL DATA +
To safeguard your Personal Data from unauthorized access, collection, use, disclosure, copying, modification, disposal or similar risks, we have put in place reasonable and appropriate administrative, physical and technical measures.
You should be aware, however, that no method of transmission over the Internet or method of electronic storage is completely secure. Data security incidents and breaches can occur due to a variety of factors that cannot reasonably be prevented; therefore, our safeguards may not always be adequate to prevent all breaches of security.
YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS AND MANAGING YOUR PERSONAL DATA +
RESIDENTS OF UNITED STATES OF AMERICA
Residents of California, Colorado, Connecticut, and/or Virginia are granted specific rights regarding access to your personal information.
Categories of Personal Information Collected in the Past Twelve (12) Months
CATEGORY
DATA COLLECTED
PURPOSE
RETENTION PERIOD
Identifiers
Contact Details (full name, unique personal identifier, IP address, device ID, email address, in-game username, account name and password, social media account names, governmental ID information)
To operate, analyze, and display content on our website; provide analytics information; advertise or market our products; provide website hosting, webcast and teleconference services
As long as the user has an account with us
Protected Classification/ Characteristics Under Federal Law
Gender and Date of Birth
For verification process
As long as the user has an account with us
Commercial Information
Transaction information, purchase history, financial details, and payment information
To improve services and to develop new services and features; fulfill and/or distribute orders or contest prizes; and conduct data analysis and report creation
As long as the user has an account with us
Biometric Information
Voice prints, photos, videos
To utilize the application
As long as the user has an account with us
Internet or other similar network activity
Browsing history, search history, online behavior, interest data, and interactions with our and other websites, applications, systems, and advertisements
To operate, analyze, and display content on our website; provide analytics information; advertise or market our products; provide website hosting, webcast and teleconference services
As long as the user has an account with us
Geolocation Data
Device Location
To operate, analyze, and display content on our website; provide analytics information
As long as the user has an account with us
Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information
Images, audio, video, recordings created using the application
To operate, analyze, and display content on our website; provide analytics information; to provide security and prevent fraud or illicit activities
As long as the user has an account with us
Inferences drawn from collected personal information
Information drawn from any of the collected personal information listed above to create a profile or summary about, for example, and individual’s preferences and characteristics
To improve services and to develop new services and features; and conduct data analysis and report creation
As long as the user has an account with us
Sensitive Personal Information
Account login information, biometric data, debit/credit card numbers, government ID
Verification process
As long as the user has an account with us
Personal Information as defined in California Customer Record statute
Name, contact information, and financial information
To operate the application; for verification process; for payment processing
As long as the user has an account with us
Sensitive information may be used, or disclosed to a service provider or contractor,for additional, specified purposes. You have the right to limit the use or disclosure of your sensitive personal information.
We may also collect other personal information outside of these categories through instances where you interact with us in person, online, or by phone or mail in the context of:
Receiving help through our customer support channels;
Participation in customer surveys or contests; and
Facilitation in the delivery of our Services and to respond to your inquiries.
CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
California Civil Code Section 1798.83, also known as the “Shine The Light” law, permits our users who are California residents to request and obtain from us, once a year and free of charge, information about categories of personal information (if any)we disclosed to third parties for direct marketing purposes and the names and addresses of all third parties with which we shared personal information in the immediately preceding calendar year. If you are a California resident and would like to make such a request, please submit your request in writing to
dpo@kumu.ph
.
If you are under 18 years of age, reside in California, and have a registered account with Kumu, you have the following rights:
To request removal of unwanted data that you publicly posted in the app; and
To request removal of such data,
Send your request to
dpo@kumu.ph
and include the email address associated with your account and a statement that you reside in California. We will make sure the data is not publicly displayed on the app, but please be aware that the data may not be completely or comprehensively removed from all our systems (e.g., backups, etc.).
CPRA Privacy Notice
This section applies only to California residents.
The California Code of Regulations defines a “resident” as:
1. every individual who is in the State of California for other than a temporary or transitory purpose; and
2. every individual who is domiciled in the State of California who is outside of the State of California for a temporary or transitory purpose All other individuals are defined as “non-residents”
If this definition of “resident” applies to you, we must adhere to certain rights and obligations regarding your personal information as provided by California Privacy Rights Act (CPRA).
YOUR RIGHTS WITH RESPECT TO YOUR PERSONAL DATA
1. Right to request deletion of the data
You can ask for the deletion of your personal information. If you ask us to delete your personal information, we will respect your request and delete your personal information, subject to certain exceptions provided by law, such as (but not limited to) the exercise by another consumer of his or her right to free speech, our compliance requirements resulting from a legal obligation, or any processing that may be required to protect against illegal activities. You may send your deletion request to dpo@kumu.ph.
2. Right to be informed
Depending on the circumstances, you have a right to know:
whether we collect and use your personal information;
the categories of personal information that we collect;
the purposes for which the collected personal information is used;
whether we sell or share personal information to third parties;
the categories of personal information that we sold, shared, or disclosed for a business purpose;
the categories of third parties to whom the personal information was sold, shared, or disclosed for a business purpose;
the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing personal information; and
the specific pieces of personal information we collected about you.
In accordance with applicable law, we are not obligated to provide or delete consumer information that is de-identified in response to a consumer request or to re-identify individual data to verify a consumer request.
3. Right to Non-Discrimination for the Exercise of a Consumer’s Privacy Rights
We will not discriminate against you if you exercise your privacy rights.
4. Right to Limit Use and Disclosure of Sensitive Personal Information
If the business collects any of the following:
social security information, drivers’ licenses, state ID cards, passport numbers;
account login information;
credit card numbers, financial account information, or credentials allowing access to such accounts;
precise geolocation;
racial or ethnic origin, religious or philosophical beliefs, union membership;
the contents of email and text, unless the business is the intended recipient of the communication; and/or
genetic data, biometric data, and health data data concerning sexual orientation and sex life
you have the right to direct that business to limit its use of your sensitive personal information which is necessary to perform its services to you.
Once a business receives your request, they are no longer allowed to use or disclose your sensitive personal information for any other purpose unless you provide consent for the use or disclosure of sensitive personal information for additional purposes.
Please note that sensitive personal information that is collected or processed without the purpose of inferring characteristics about a consumer is not covered by this right, as well as the publicly available information.
To exercise your right to limit use and disclosure of sensitive personal information, please send your request to
dpo@kumu.ph
.
5. Verification Process
Upon receiving your request, we will need to verify your identity to determine whether you are the same person whose information is in our system. These verification efforts will require you to provide information so that we can match it with the information you have previously provided to us. We may also use other verification methods as the circumstances dictate.
We will only use personal information provided in your request to verify your identity or authority to make the request. To the extent possible, we will avoid requesting additional information from you for the purposes of verification. However, if we cannot verify your identity from the information already maintained by us, we may request that you provide additional information for the purposes of verifying your identity and for security or fraud-prevention purposes. We will delete such additionally provided information as soon as we conclude the verification process.
6. Other privacy rights
You may object to the processing of your personal information;
You may request correction of your personal data if it is incorrect or no longer relevant, or ask to restrict the processing of the information;
You can designate an authorized agent to make a request under the CPRA on your behalf. However, we may deny a request from an authorized agent that does not submit proof that they have been validly authorized to act on your behalf in accordance with CPRA;
You may request to opt out from future selling or sharing of your personal information to third parties. Upon receiving an opt-out request, we will act upon the request as soon as feasibly possible, but no later than fifteen (15) days from the date of the request submission.
To exercise these rights, you can contact us by emailing
dpo@kumu.ph
. If you have a complaint about how we handle your data, we would like to hear from you.
COLORADO RESIDENTS
This section applies only to Colorado residents. Under the Colorado Privacy Act (CPA), you have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Right to be informed whether or not we are processing your personal data
Right to access your personal data
Right to correct inaccuracies in your personal data
Right to request deletion of your personal data
Right to obtain a copy of the personal data you previously shared with us
Right to opt out of the processing of your personal data if it is used for targeted advertising, the sale of personal data, or profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects (“profiling”)
To submit a request to exercise these rights described above, please email
dpo@kumu.ph
.
If we decline to take action regarding your request and you wish to appeal your decision, please email us at
dpo@kumu.ph
with Subject “Appeal”.
We will inform you, in writing of any action taken or not taken in response to the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions within forty-five (45) days from receipt of your appeal.
CONNECTICUT RESIDENTS
This section applies only to Connecticut residents. Under the Connecticut DataPrivacy Act (CTDPA), you have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Right to be informed whether or not we are processing your personal data
Right to access your personal data
Right to correct inaccuracies in your personal data
Right to request deletion of your personal data
Right to obtain a copy of the personal data you previously shared with us
Right to opt out of the processing of your personal data if it is used for targeted advertising, the sale of personal data, or profiling in furtherance of decisions that product legal or similarly significant effects (“profiling”)
To submit a request to exercise these rights described above, please email
dpo@kumu.ph
.
If we decline to take action regarding your request and you wish to appeal your decision, please email us at
dpo@kumu.ph
with Subject “Appeal”.
We will inform you, in writing of any action taken or not taken in response to the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions within forty-five (45) days from receipt of your appeal.
VIRGINIA RESIDENTS
Under the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (VCDPA):
“Consumer” means a natural person who is a resident of the Commonwealth acting only in an individual or household context. It does not include a natural person acting in a commercial or employment context.
“Personal data” means any information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable natural person. “Personal data” does not include de-identified data or publicly available information.
“Sale of personal data ” means the exchange of personal data for monetary consideration. If this definition “consumer” applies to you, we must adhere to certain rights andobligations regarding your personal data.
Your rights with respect to your personal data
Right to be informed whether or not we are processing your personal data
Right to access your personal data
Right to correct inaccuracies in your personal data
Right to request deletion of your personal data
Right to obtain a copy of the personal data you previously shared with us
Right to opt out of the processing of your personal data if it is used for targeted advertising, the sale of personal data, or profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects (“profiling”)
Exercise your rights provided under the Virginia VCDPA
You may contact us by email at
dpo@kumu.ph
.
If you are using an authorized agent to exercise your rights, we may deny a request if the authorized agent does not submit proof that they have been validly authorized to act on your behalf.
Verification process
We may request that you provide additional information reasonably necessary to verify you and your consumer’s request. If you submit the request through an authorized agent, we may need to collect additional information to verify your identity before processing your request.
Upon receiving your request, we will respond without undue delay, but in all cases,within forty-five (45) days of receipt. The response period may be extended once by forty-five (45) additional days when reasonably necessary. We will inform you of any such extension within the initial 45-day response period, together with the reason for the extension.
Right to appeal
If we decline to take action regarding your request, we will inform you of our decision and reasoning behind it. If you wish to appeal our decision, please email us at dpo@kumu.ph. Within sixty (60) days of receipt of an appeal, we will inform you in writing of any action taken or not taken in response to the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions. If your appeal is denied, you may contact the Attorney General to submit a complaint.
PRIVACY RIGHTS +
We generally rely on Personal Data provided by you (or your authorized representative). In order to ensure that your Personal Data is current, complete and accurate, please update us if there are changes to your Personal Data.
Subject to certain restrictions and limitations, you have certain rights in respect of your Personal Data. In particular, you have the following rights:
Right to access
– to receive a copy of your Personal Data. We will have to adequately verify your identity before any action can be taken;
Right to rectification
– to request for amendments to be made to your Personal Data where this is inaccurate or incorrect;
Right to restriction
– to ask that we restrict or suppress the processing of your Personal Data which means that whilst we are permitted to store the Personal Data we cannot otherwise process it;
Right to erasure
– to request for the deletion of your Personal Data that we hold. However, we may not always be able to delete your Personal Data for legal and regulatory reasons;
Right to object
– to object to the processing of your Personal Data which we carry out in reliance on our legitimate interests. In such instances, we will investigate to see if there is compelling reason for processing to continue. You cannot object to the processing which is a legal obligation or where we must process your Personal Data to satisfy a contract to which you are a party. Also, you can object to marketing communications at any time;
Right to withdraw you consent
– to withdraw your consent to the processing of your Personal Data at any time (where kumu is processing your personal information based on your consent). Please note that withdrawing your consent may prevent us from further providing all or part of our Services to you but does not affect the lawfulness of our processing of your Personal Data based on such consent before the withdrawal;
Right to data portability
– to receive certain Personal Data that you have provided to us, in a machine-readable form and/or that we transmit it to a third party with your express authorisation; and
Right to lodge a complaint
– to complain to the relevant supervisory authority if your privacy rights are violated, or if you have suffered as a result of unlawful processing of your Personal Data.
We may ask you for identifying information and attempt to match it to information that we maintain about you. If we can’t verify your identity or authority to make the request, and confirm the Personal Data belongs to you, we won’t be able to complete your request. We will notify you to inform you of this. You do not need to create an account with us to make a verifiable request. Personal data submitted in a verifiable request will only be used to confirm the requestor’s identity or permission to make the request.
If you would like to exercise your rights, please contact the Data Protection Officer using the contact details below.
To the extent permitted under applicable data protection laws, we may charge a reasonable fee for an access request to cover our administrative costs of providing the information in certain situations. If so, we will inform you of the fee before we proceed with your request.
We will respond to your request as soon as reasonably possible and within thirty (30) calendar days. Should we not be able to respond to your request within thirty (30) days after receiving your request and where we are permitted to do so under applicable data protection laws, we will inform you in writing within thirty (30) days of the time by which we will be able to respond to your request.
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION OR ASSISTANCE +
To protect your privacy and implement security, we will take reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting your request. We reserve the right to charge an appropriate fee for complying with your request where allowed by applicable law. There may be situations where we cannot grant your request especially if it jeopardizes the privacy of others, is frivolous or vexatious, or would be extremely impractical.
CHILDREN’S PRIVACY +
kumu recognizes and values the importance of protecting the privacy of children, which we define as anyone under the age of thirteen. Our Services are not intended for or directed to children under the age of thirteen (13), and anyone under the age of thirteen are not permitted to use kumu. If we discover that we are processing data for such users (under the age of 13), we shall take reasonable steps to guarantee that their records are erased and data processing is ceased. Please inform us if you suspect we have Personal Data about or acquired from a child under the age of 13.
You must also be of legal age in your country to consent to the processing of your Personal Data (in some countries we may allow your parent or guardian to do so on your behalf).
ACCESSIBILITY +
We are committed to ensuring that our communications are accessible to people with disabilities. To make accessibility-related requests or report barriers, please contact us at dpo@kumu.ph.
CHANGES +
We may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time without any prior notice. You are advised to review this Privacy Policy periodically for any changes. You may determine if any such revision has taken place by referring to the date on which this Privacy Policy was last updated.
If we make material changes to the Privacy Policy, we will let you know via email and/or a prominent notice on our Service, prior to the change becoming effective and update the date at the top of this Privacy Policy. Your continued use of our services constitutes your acknowledgement and acceptance of such changes.
CONTACT +
You may contact our Data Protection Officer if you have any inquiries or feedback on our Personal Data protection policies and procedures, or if you wish to make any request, in the following manner:
Data Protection Officer
dpo@kumu.ph
Unit 702 – 703 Liberty Plaza Building, 102 HV Dela Costa St. cor. Valero St.
Salcedo Village Makati City.
MORE RESOURCES
Terms of Use
Old Terms of Use
Old Privacy Policy v1.0
Cookie Policy
Old Privacy Policy v2.0
Kumunity Guidelines
Responding to legal requests
Recruitment Privacy Policy
Seal of Registration
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en-US#infocollect:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 1
https://kumu.ph/privacy-policy-old/:
1. Introduction to this Privacy Policy
1.1 At Kumu, Inc., we take your privacy very seriously. We are committed to complying with Republic Act No. 10173, otherwise known as the Data Privacy Act of 2012, and its Implementing Rules and Regulations.
1.2 In the course of providing you with the Services or access to the Platform (as defined in our Terms of Use), we will be collecting, using, disclosing, storing, and/or processing data, including your personal data.
1.3 This Privacy Policy exists to keep you informed about how we collect, use, disclose, store, and/or process the data we collect and receive during the course of providing the Services or access to the Platform to you, our user. We will only collect, use, disclose, store, and/or process your personal data in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
1.4 It is important that you read this Privacy Policy together with any other applicable notices we may provide on specific occasions when we are collecting, using, disclosing, and/or processing personal data about you, so that you are fully aware of how and why we are using your personal data.
1.5 BY CLICKING OR CHECKING “SIGN UP”, “I AGREE TO KUMU’S PRIVACY POLICY”, “I AGREE AND CONSENT TO THE COLLECTION, USE, DISCLOSURE, STORAGE, AND/OR PROCESSING OF MY PERSONAL DATA FOR THE PURPOSE STATED IN, AND UNDER THE TERMS OF, KUMU’S PRIVACY POLICY” OR SIMILAR STATEMENTS AVAILABLE ON THE KUMU REGISTRATION PAGE, YOU ACKNOWLEDGE THAT YOU HAVE BEEN NOTIFIED OF AND UNDERSTOOD THE TERMS OF THIS PRIVACY POLICY AND THAT YOU HAVE AGREED AND CONSENTED TO THE COLLECTION, USE, DICLOSURE, AND/OR PROCESSING OF YOUR PERSONAL DATA AS DESCRIBED AND UNDER THE TERMS HEREIN. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE WITH THE TERMS OF THIS PRIVACY POLICY, PLEASE DO NOT ACCESS THE PLATFORM.
1.6 We may update this Privacy Policy from time to time. Any changes we make to this Privacy Policy in the future will be posted on this page and notified to you, whereupon your consent to said changes, continued use of the Services or access to the Platform, including placing Orders on the Platform, shall constitute your acknowledgment and acceptance of the changes we make to this Privacy Policy. Please check back frequently to see any updates or changes to this Privacy Policy.
1.7 This Privacy Policy applies in conjunction with other notices, contractual clauses, and consent clauses that apply in relation to the collection, storage, use, disclosure, and/or processing of your personal data by us and is not intended to override them unless we expressly state otherwise.
1.8 This Privacy Policy does not apply to the third-party online/mobile store from which you install the Kumu mobile application or make payments, including any in-game virtual items, which may also collect and use data about you. We are not responsible for any of the data collected by any such third party.
1.9 You can visit the Platform and browse without having to provide personal details. However, you will be required to sign up for an account if you wish to use the Services.
2. The Personal Data We Collect From You
2.1 Personal Data means any information, whether recorded in a material form or not, from which the identity of an individual is apparent or can be reasonably and directly ascertained by the entity holding the information, or when put together with other information would directly, indirectly, and certainly identify an individual.
2.2 During the course of your use of the Platform and the provision of the Services, we may collect Personal Data from you, which includes but is not limited to:
(a) identity data, such as your name, gender, profile picture, and date of birth;
(b) contact data, such as billing address, delivery address, email address, and phone numbers;
(c) account data, such as bank account and payment details;
(d) transaction data, such as details about orders and payments to and from you, and other details of products and Services that you have purchased or obtained through the Platform;
(e) technical data, such as Internet protocol (IP) address, your login data, browser type and version, time zone setting and location, browser plug-in types and versions, operating system and platform, international mobile equipment identity, device identifier, and other information and technology on the devices you use to access the Platform;
(f) profile data, such as your username and password, purchases or orders made by you, your interests, preferences, feedback, and survey responses, and other information you may provide when entering contests or giveaways;
(g) usage data, such as information on how you use the Platform, products, and Services or view any content on the Platform;
(h) location data, such as when you capture and share your location with us in the form of photographs or videos and upload such content to the Platform or GPS information from your mobile device;
(i) biometric data, such as voice files when you use our voice search function, and facial and other bodily features and voice of yourself and/or another other persons featured in your video when you upload videos onto the Platform; and
(j) marketing and communications data, such as your preferences in receiving marketing from us and/or third parties and your communication preferences.
2.3 During the course of your use of the Platform and the provision of the Services, we may receive Personal Data from you in the following situations:
(a) When you create an account with us;
(b) When you apply for any of the Services or purchase any products available on the Platform;
(c) When you use any of the features or functions available on the Platform or Services;
(d) When you record any user-generated content which is uploaded on the Platform;
(e) When you use the chat function on the Platform;
(f) When you post messages in the comment sections or in our forums;
(g) When you like posts;
(h) When you subscribe to our publications or marketing collaterals;
(i) When you enter a competition, promotion, or survey or send feedback;
(j) When you participate in any activity or campaign on the Platform;
(k) When you log in to your account on the Platform or otherwise interact with us via an external service or application, such as Facebook or Google;
(l) When any other user of the Platform posts any comments on the content you have uploaded on the Platform or when you post any comments on other users’ content uploaded to the Platform;
(m) When a third party files a complaint against you or the content you have posted on the Platform;
(n) When you access or use mobile games on the Platform; and
(o) When you interact with us offline, including when you interact with our outsourced customer service agents.
2.4 During the course of your use of the Platform and the provision of the Services, you expressly consent to the transfer of your Personal Data from third parties to Kumu for the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy or any other terms.
2.5 You must only submit Personal Data which is accurate and not misleading and you must keep it up to date and inform us of any changes to the Personal Data you have provided to us. We shall have the right to request for documentation to verify the Personal Data provided by you as part of our user verification processes.
2.6 We will only be able to collect your Personal Data if you voluntarily submit the Personal Data to us or as otherwise provided for under this Privacy Policy. Unfortunately, if you choose not to submit your Personal Data to us or subsequently withdraw your consent to our use of your Personal Data, we may not be able to provide you with the Services or access to the Platform.
2.7 We may request access or permission to certain features from your mobile device, including your mobile device’s bluetooth, camera, contacts, microphone, reminders, social media accounts, storage, and other features. If you wish to change our access or permissions, you may do so in your device’s settings.
2.8 We may request to send you push notifications regarding your account or the Platform. If you wish to opt-out from receiving these types of communications, you may turn them off in your device’s settings.
2.9 You may access and update your personal information submitted to us at any time as described below.
2.10 If you provide Personal Data of any third party to us, you represent and warrant that you have obtained the necessary consent, license, and permissions from that third party to share and transfer his/her Personal Data to us, and for us to collect, store, use, and disclose that data in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
2.11 If you sign up to be a user on our Platform using your social media account or link your Kumu account to your social media account or use certain other Kumu social media features, we may access Personal Data about you which you have voluntarily provided to your social media provider in accordance with the provider’s policies and we will manage your Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
2.12 If you choose to share data about yourself via your profile, online chat, or other interactive areas of the Platform, please be advised that all data you disclose in these areas is public and that your data will be accessible to anyone who accesses the Platform.
3. Use and Disclosure of Personal Data
3.1 The Personal Data we collect from you or via third parties may be used by us, or shared with or transferred to third parties (including related companies, third-party service providers, and their service providers and related companies, companies located both inside and outside your home country, third-party sellers, and other users), for certain purposes, which include but are not limited to the following:
(a) To facilitate your use of the Services or access to the Platform;
(b) To enable user-to-user communications;
(c) To respond to your queries, feedback, claims, disputes, troubleshoot problems, or product and customer service requests, whether directly or through outsourced customer service agents;
(d) To process orders you submit through the Platform (payments that you make through the Platform for products will be processed by our agents);
(e) To deliver the products you have purchased through the Platform. We may pass your personal information on to a third party in order to make delivery of the product to you;
(f) To update you on the delivery of the products and for customer support purposes;
(g) To compare information and verify with third parties in order to ensure that the information is accurate;
(h) To improve the efficiency and operation of the Platform and/or Services;
(i) To ascertain your identity for fraud detection purposes and prevent fraudulent transactions, monitor against theft, and protect against criminal activity;
(j) To facilitate the takedown of prohibited and controlled items from our Platform;
(k) To create and administer your account (if any) with us;
(l) To generate a personal profile about you;
(m) To verify and carry out financial transactions in relation to payments you make online;
(n) To audit the downloading of data from the Platform;
(o) To improve the layout or content of the pages of the Platform and customize them for users;
(p) To identify visitors on the Platform;
(q) To carry out research on our users’ demographics and behavior and monitor and analyze usage and trends to improve your experience with the Platform;
(r) To notify you of updates to the Platform;
(s) To provide you with information we think you may find useful or which you have requested from us, including information about third-party sellers’ products and services, provided you have indicated that you have not objected to being contacted for these purposes;
(t) To display your name, username, or profile on the Platform;
(u) To allow other users to identify you (via the “Find my friends” or any other similar function) as a user of the Service, to allow you to find other users and to connect with them on the Platform, and to support the socializing function of the Services;
(v) To promote the Services and use information that you give to us, such as user-generated content that you can choose to upload or broadcast on our Platform which will be accessible on the Internet and may be shared by the public (the latter of which is not within our control), as part of our advertising and marketing campaigns to promote the Platform;
(w) To process any complaints, feedback, enforcement action, and take-down requests in relation to any content you have uploaded to the Platform;
(x) To display on scoreboards on the Platform in relation to campaigns, mobile games, or any other activity;
(y) To derive further attributes relating to you based on Personal Data provided by you (whether to us or third parties), in order to provide you with more targeted and/or relevant information;
(z) To send you newsletters and/or marketing or promotional materials about third-party sellers’ products and services from time to time and to offer new products, services, mobile applications, and/or recommendations to you; and
(aa) To request feedback and contact you about your use of the Platform or solicit support for the Platform.
We may also conduct automated decision-making processes in accordance with any of these purposes.
3.2 For the avoidance of doubt, you acknowledge and consent to Kumu sharing anonymized information such as but not limited to those in the following circumstances:
(a) Aggregated information. We may conduct joint data analytics projects with selected third-party providers using anonymized information to predict user interests and provide users with more targeted and/or relevant information based on aggregated information about that user’s activities outside the Platform.
(b) Behavioral-based advertising. We may collaborate with selected third parties using anonymized information to derive certain models that would facilitate more accurate advertising to selected users.
3.3 You may unsubscribe from receiving marketing information at any time by using the unsubscribe function within the electronic marketing material. We may use your contact information to send newsletters from us and from our related companies.
3.4 If you interact with other users of the Platform, those users may see your name, profile photo, and descriptions of your activity, including sending invitations to other users, chatting with other users, liking posts, and following blogs.
3.5 When you post comments, contributions, or other content to the Platform, your posts may be viewed by all users and may be publicly and/or permanently distributed outside the Platform.
3.6 We may share your information with our affiliates, which include our parent company and any subsidiaries, joint venture partners, or other companies controlled by us or under common control with us.
3.7 If we reorganize or sell all or any portion of our assets, undergo a merger, or are acquired by another entity, we may transfer your information to the successor entity. In the event that we cease business operations or enter bankruptcy, your information shall become an asset to be transferred or acquired by a third party. You acknowledge that such transfers may occur and that the transferee may decline to honor the commitments made in this Privacy Policy.
We are not responsible for the actions of third parties with whom you share personal or sensitive data, and we have no authority to manage or control third-party solicitations. If you no longer wish to receive correspondence, emails, or other communications from third parties, you are responsible for contacting the third party directly.
3.8 In exceptional circumstances, we may be required to disclose personal information, such as when there are grounds to believe that the disclosure is necessary to prevent a threat to life or health, to investigate or remedy potential or actual violations of our policies, to protect the rights, property, and safety of others, or for law enforcement purposes, or for fulfillment of legal and regulatory requirements and requests.
3.9 We may share and/or permit the sharing of your Personal Data with third parties and our affiliates for any of the abovementioned purposes, including but not limited to facilitating your use of the Services, completing a transaction with you, managing your account and our relationship with you, fraud protection and credit risk reduction, marketing, and fulfilling any legal or regulatory requirements and requests as deemed necessary by us. In sharing your Personal Data with them, we endeavor to ensure that the third parties and our affiliates keep your Personal Data secure from unauthorized access, collection, use, disclosure, processing, or similar risks and that your Personal Data be retained only for as long as needed in order to achieve the abovementioned purposes.
3.10 If you are located in the Philippines, we may transfer or permit the transfer of your Personal Data outside of the Philippines for any of the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy.
4. Rights of User
4.1 As a user you have the right to:
(a) withdraw your consent to the continued use, disclosure, and/or processing of your Personal Data;
(b) request erasure or blocking of your Personal Data;
(c) request correction of inaccurate or erroneous Personal Data, unless such request is vexatious or unreasonable;
(d) request for reasonable access to your Personal Data; and
(e) request indemnification for damages sustained due to such inaccurate, incomplete, outdated, false, unlawfully obtained, or unauthorized use of Personal Data.
4.2 If you wish to withdraw your consent, or request for erasure or blocking of your Personal Data at any time, you may do so by contacting us at dpo@kumu.ph.
4.3 Please note that if you exercise any of your rights set out above, we may not be in a position to continue to provide the Services to you or perform on any contract we may have with you, and we will not be liable in the event that we do not continue to provide the Services to or perform our contract with you. Our legal rights and remedies are expressly reserved in such an event.
4.4 If you no longer wish to receive correspondence, emails, or other communications from us, you may opt-out by:
(a) noting your preferences at the time you register your account with the Platform;
(b) logging into your account settings and updating your preferences; or
(c) contacting us at support@kumu.ph.
4.5 If you no longer wish to receive correspondence, emails, or other communications from third parties, you are responsible for contacting the third party directly.
4.6 You may terminate your account at any time by contacting us at support@kumu.ph. Upon your request to terminate your account, we will deactivate or delete your account and information from our active databases. However, some information may be retained in our files in order to prevent fraud, troubleshoot problems, assist with any investigations, enforce our Terms of Use, and/or comply with legal requirements.
5. Updating Your Personal Data
5.1 It is important that the Personal Data you provide to us is accurate and complete for you to continue using the Platform and for us to provide the Services. You are responsible for informing us of changes to your Personal Data, or in the event you believe that the Personal Data we have about you is inaccurate, incomplete, misleading, or out of date.
5.2 You can review and/or update your Personal Data at any time by accessing your account on the Platform.
5.3 We take steps to share the updates to your Personal Data with third parties and our affiliates with whom we may have shared your Personal Data if necessary for any of the aforementioned purposes.
6. Accessing Your Personal Data
6.1 You may request information about your Personal Data which we have collected, or inquire about the ways in which your Personal Data may have been used, disclosed, stored, or processed by us within the past year. In order to facilitate processing of your request, it may be necessary for us to request further information relating to your request.
6.2 We reserve the right to charge a reasonable administrative fee for the retrieval of your Personal Data records. In any case, you shall be informed of the fee before any such request is processed.
6.3 We will respond to your request as soon as reasonably possible. Should we not be able to respond to your request within twenty-one (21) days from the date of your request, we shall inform you in writing. If we are unable to provide you with any personal data or to make a correction requested by you, we shall generally inform you of the reasons why we are unable to do so (except where we are not required to do so under the applicable data protection laws).
7. Security of Your Personal Data
7.1 To safeguard your Personal Data from unauthorized access, collection, use, disclosure, processing, copying, modification, disposal, loss, misuse, modification, or similar risks, we have introduced appropriate administrative, physical, and technical measures such as:
(a) restricting access to Personal Data to individuals who require access;
(b) maintaining technology products and systems to prevent unauthorized computer access; and
(c) using encryption technology when processing your financial details.
7.2 If you believe that your privacy has been breached by Kumu, please contact us immediately.
7.3 You should be aware, however, that no method of transmission over the Internet or method of electronic storage is completely secure. While security cannot be guaranteed, we strive to protect the security of your information and are constantly reviewing and enhancing our information security measures.
7.4 Your password is the key to your account. Please use unique numbers, letters, and special characters, and do not share your Kumu password to anyone. If you do share your password with others, you shall be responsible for all actions taken in the name of your account and the consequences. If you lose control of your password, you may lose substantial control over your Personal Data and other data submitted to Kumu. You may also be subject to legally binding actions taken on your behalf. Therefore, if your password has been compromised for any reason or if you have grounds to believe that your password has been compromised, you should immediately contact us and change your password. You are reminded to log out of your account and close the web browser when you are finished, especially if using a shared computer.
8. Retention of Personal Data
8.1 We shall only retain your Personal Data for as long as either is required of us by law or is relevant for the purposes for which it was collected.
8.2 We shall cease to retain your Personal Data, or remove the means by which the data can be associated with you, as soon as it is reasonable to assume that such retention no longer serves the purposes for which the Personal Data was collected and is no longer necessary for any legal or business purpose.
9. Minors
9.1 Kumu does not sell products for purchase by minors (which is to be determined based on the applicable law), nor does it intend to provide any of the Services or the use of the Platform to minors. We do not knowingly collect any Personal Data relating to minors.
9.2 You hereby confirm and warrant that you are above the age of minority and you are capable of understanding and accepting the terms of this Privacy Policy. If you are a minor, you may use our Platform only with the consent and involvement of a parent or legal guardian.
9.3 As a parent or legal guardian, please do not allow minors under your care to submit Personal Data to Kumu. In the event that such Personal Data of a minor is disclosed to Kumu, you hereby consent to the processing of the minor’s Personal Data and accept and agree to be bound by this Privacy Policy and take responsibility for his or her actions.
9.4 We will not be responsible for any unauthorized use of the Services on the Platform by yourself, users who act on your behalf, or any unauthorized users. It is your responsibility to make your own informed decisions about the use of the Services on the Platform and take the necessary steps to prevent any misuse of the Services on the Platform.
10. Collection of Computer Data
10.1 We or our authorized service providers may use cookies, web beacons, and other similar technologies for storing data to help provide you with a better, faster, safer, and personalized experiences when you use the Services or access the Platform.
10.2 When you visit the Platform through your computer, mobile device, or any other device with Internet connectivity, our company servers will automatically record data that your browser sends whenever you visit a website. This data may include:
(a) your computer or device’s IP address;
(b) browser type;
(c) webpage you were visiting before you came to the Platform;
(d) the pages within the Platform which you visit; and
(e) the time spent on those pages, items and data searched for on the Platform, access times and dates, and other statistics.
10.3 This data is collected for analysis and evaluation in order to help us improve our Platform and the services and products we provide.
10.4 Cookies are small text files (typically made up of letters and numbers) placed in the memory of your browser or device when you visit a website or view a message. They allow us to recognize a particular device or browser and help us to personalize the content to match your preferred interests more quickly, and to make the Services and the Platform more convenient and useful to you.
10.5 You may be able to manage and delete cookies through your browser or device settings. For more information on how to do so, visit the help material of your browser or device.
10.6 Web beacons are small graphic images that may be included on our Service and the Platform. They allow us to count users who have viewed these pages so that we can better understand your preference and interests.
10.7 Most web browsers and some mobile operating systems include a Do-Not-Track (“DNT”) feature or setting you can activate to signal your privacy preference not to have data about your online browsing activities monitored and collected. No uniform technology standard for recognizing and implementing DNT signals has been finalized. As such, we do not currently respond to DNT browser signals or any other mechanism that automatically communicates your choice not to be tracked online. If a standard for online tracking is adopted and implemented for us to follow in the future, we shall inform you about that practice in a revised version of this Privacy Policy.
11. Kumu’s Right to Disclose Personal Data
11.1 You acknowledge and agree that Kumu has the right to disclose your Personal Data to any legal, regulatory, governmental, tax, law enforcement or other authorities, or the relevant right owners, if Kumu has reasonable grounds to believe that the disclosure of your Personal Data is necessary for the purpose of meeting any obligations, requirements, or arrangements, whether voluntary or mandatory, as a result of cooperating with an order, investigation, and/or request of any nature made by such parties. To the extent permissible by applicable law, you agree not to take any action and/or waive your rights to take any action against Kumu for the disclosure of your Personal Data in these circumstances.
12. Third-Party Sites
12.1 The Platform may contain links to other websites and applications of interest operated by other parties not affiliated with us, such as merchants or payment gateways. We are not responsible for the privacy and security practices and policies of websites, services, or applications operated by any third parties which may be linked to or from the Platform. You are advised to check on the applicable privacy policies of those websites, services, or applications to determine how those third parties will handle any information they may collect from you.
13. Questions, Feedback, Concerns, Suggestions, or Complaints
13.1 If you have any questions on personal data protection or data privacy, please refer to our list of frequently asked questions.
13.2 If your question is not covered in our FAQs, or if you have any feedback, concerns, suggestions, or complaints in relation to Personal Data, please feel free to contact us at  dpo@kumu.ph.
CONTACT US
If you have questions or comments about this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
KUMUMedia Technologies Inc.
919 North Market Street, Suite 950
Wilmington, DE 19801
support@kumu.ph
Enter your Mobile Number:
Send
Sub-policy 2
https://kumu.ph/privacy-policy-v2/:
Kumu App Privacy Policy (v2.0)
At kumu, as part of our commitment to create a safe space, we are working our best to ensure that your privacy is respected and your Personal Data is protected.
Thus, we want you to take a moment and understand what data we obtain about you and our data privacy practices and policies, so you can make an informed decision and exercise meaningful control over your data.
This Privacy Policy will take effect on August 15, 2022. For the old version of the policy click
here
.
HIGHLIGHTS
You should read our Privacy Policy in its entirety, but here are a few key points we hope you will take away:
Kumu is accessible to the general public from anywhere in the world. When you livestream, create a profile, follow a streamer, give virtual gifts, participate in campaigns or post a clip on kumu that are public or intended to be public in nature, individuals that use kumu will access this information and may have the ability to acquire, use, or reveal such information to others. Furthermore, several of our Services (as defined below) are intended to offer others with information on user behavior, such as virtual gifting or a follow to a streamer. We advise you to keep this in mind when using kumu. However, we also provide non-public communication channels on kumu, such as private streaming and chat.
When you participate in campaigns sponsored by our Business Partners (i.e. any company or individual which transacts business with Kumu, including but not limited to advertisers and merchants), we may share your Personal Data with them in accordance with the terms and conditions of the campaigns. For example, if you participate in DTI (Philippines) registered campaigns of a Business Partner, we may share your information with DTI (Philippines) as part our legal obligation and with the Business Partner as part of our contractual obligation.
When you purchase products from our Business Partners, we may share your Personal Data with them to fulfill your orders and to third party service providers for the delivery of your ordered products.
We collect certain Personal Data (e.g. information regarding the device you’re using, IP address, etc.) from you when you use kumu, even if you’re simply browsing livestreams. We use this information to keep the platform safe and to offer you more relevant content, suggested users and advertisements.
We want to hear from you if you have any concerns regarding this Privacy Policy, how we collect or use your Personal Data, or anything else relating to our policies or practices at kumu. You are welcome to contact us at any time using the contact details set out at the end of the Privacy Policy.
APPLICABILITY
This Privacy Policy is applicable to the collection and use of Personal Data by KumuMedia International Pte. Ltd. (“kumu,” “we,” “us,” or “our”).  It describes kumu’s practices regarding the collection, use, disclosure, sale and other processing of Personal Data when you:
use kumu products and services (e.g. websites, applications, or services supplied, owned, or operated by kumu) which we refer to collectively in this Privacy Policy as our “Services,” or
otherwise communicate with us
Kumu acts as the “controller” of your Personal Data for the activities described in this Privacy Policy. That means kumu is the legal entity deciding why and how your Personal Data is collected and used.
EXTERNAL PARTY SITES
Our Services may contain links to other websites [and apps] that we do not operate, which may have privacy policies that differ from our own. If you click on a third party link, you may be directed to that third party’s website [or app landing page]. We strongly advise you to review the privacy policy of every third party site and/or app that you visit. We have no control over and assume no responsibility for the content, privacy policies or practices of any third party sites, apps or services.
WHAT PERSONAL DATA DO WE COLLECT – CATEGORIES AND SOURCES
For purposes of this Privacy Policy, “Personal Data” means any data that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household.  This implies that Personal Data includes information that directly identifies you, such as your name, as well as information that can reasonably be used to identify you, such as your device number in certain circumstances. Personal data does not include aggregated data (which does not identify a particular individual).
USER-PROVIDED AND AUTOMATICALLY-COLLECTED PERSONAL DATA
We may collect the following categories of Personal Data from you when you [download our app], create an account, stream through our Services, participate in our campaigns and challenges, post klips, use our chat services, purchase coins and share virtual gifts through our Services, contact us (including via social media), participate in our surveys and events, purchase a product in our kumu shop, or otherwise interact with us by using our Services.
USER-PROVIDED PERSONAL DATA
Personal identifiers.
Name, email address, physical address, phone number, [social media account names], registered devices, gender, in-game username (for gaming tournaments and competitions) and age
Payment Information
. Information about billing address and payment method, such as bank account information, credit, debit, or other payment card information
Transaction Information
. Data about purchases and use of services or transactions facilitated by kumu, including purchases made through the Services
Usage Information.
Audio, videos, images, and other information uploaded, viewed ,shared and downloaded on and from the Services; interactions and exchanges with other users (e.g. chat, stream, etc.)
Government ID Data.
We may request a government-issued ID in some instances, such as for verification of your identity, or as required by law
Other Information You Provide to Us
. The content of your kumu correspondence, including exchanges with our customer support (including social media)
Inferences Drawn From your Data.
Inferences we make based upon your interests and viewing preferences
Contact List.
To ensure transparency and provide clarity to our users, we have implemented a feature in our app that allows you to connect and find friends more easily. In order to facilitate this process, our app may require access to the contacts on your device. By granting permission, our app will scan your contacts to identify individuals who are already using our app, making it simpler for you to connect with them. Please note that we prioritize user privacy and the security of your personal information. We do not store your contacts on our servers, nor do we share them with any third parties. The sole purpose of accessing your contacts is to enhance your app experience and facilitate social connections within the app. We respect your choice and understand the sensitivity of personal data. Therefore, you can choose to revoke this permission at any time through your device settings.
AUTOMATICALLY-COLLECTED DATA
When you use our Services, we use cookies and other technologies to automatically collect, record, store and otherwise process the following types of Personal Data:
Usage Data
. Data about your activities on and use of our Services, such as app launches inside our Services, browser history, product engagement, IP address or other unique identifiers, and other information regarding your interaction with our Services and our advertisements
Device Information.
Data that can be used to identify your device, such as the device ID, or information about the device, such as the browser type
We use Google Analytics to evaluate the use of our website. Google Analytics uses cookies and other identifiers to collect information, such as how often users visit a website, what pages they visit when they do so, and what other websites they visited prior to visiting a website. To learn more about how Google Analytics collects Personal Data, review
Google’s Privacy Policy
.
To learn more about cookies, please check our cookie policy here
INFORMATION FROM OTHER SOURCES
kumu may receive Personal Data about you from other individuals, from businesses or third parties acting at your direction, from our Business Partners such as social media platforms with which you interact, and from third parties that work with us to provide our products and services and assist us with security and fraud prevention and improving our Services.
For instance, we may acquire your Personal Data from social media networks (such as Facebook). By accessing or connecting our Services through social media, you authorize kumu to collect, retain, and otherwise process such Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Use.
HOW KUMU USES YOUR PERSONAL DATA
Kumu processes the following types of Personal Data for the following purposes and in reliance on the following legal bases:
Type(s) of Personal Data
Purpose(s) for Processing
Legal Bases for Processing
All types of Personal Data depending on the Service requested
To perform our obligations in the course of or in connection with Services requested by you
To conclude and perform a contract with you (e.g. Terms of Use, Campaigns Terms and Conditions)
Personal Identifier
Usage Information
To enable enable you to engage with other users
To allow you to leave comments on content and engage in campaigns or rewards programs
Personal Identifiers
To communicate with you on service-related issues
Personal Identifiers
Government ID Data
Payment Information
Transaction Information
Device Information
Other Information You Provide to Us
To verify your identity and respond to, handle, and process queries, requests, applications, complaints, and feedback from you
Personal Identifiers
Government ID Data
Payment Information
Transaction Information
Device Information
Other Information You Provide to Us
To manage your relationship with us including to provide customer support services
Personal Identifiers
Payment Information
To process payment or credit transactions
Personal Identifiers
To provide you with news, special offers and general information about other goods, services and events
Where required under applicable law, we will ask for and rely on your consent. You can withdraw your consent to the processing at any time but this does not affect the lawfulness of our processing of your personal information based on consent before such withdrawal.
Personal Identifiers
To disclose Personal Data of the winners of DTI registered campaigns to Philippines’ Department of Trade and Industry
To comply with a legal obligation.
Personal Identifiers
Payment Information
Transaction Information
To process your Personal Data in accordance to the regulatory requirements of Anti-Money Laundering Council and Bangko Sentral ng Pilipinas
Personal Identifiers
Device Information
Transaction Information
Usage Data
To access, preserve or disclose personal data in response to a request from a regulator, law enforcement, court or others
Inferences Drawn From Your Data
Usage Information
Usage Data
To improve users’ experience with kumu by providing content recommendations, user suggestions and relevant notification
To pursue our legitimate interests to make your experience of our products and Services efficient and effective
Inferences Drawn From Your Data
Usage Information
Usage Data
To operate, maintain, improve, provide, create, and develop all of the features, functionality, and Services (new and existing) found on kumu
To pursue our legitimate interests to make your experience of our products and Services efficient and effective
Usage Data
Device Information
To provide and increase safety and security for our websites, products, software, or applications and Services (by preventing, detecting and implementing proper measures against spam, scammers, abuse, misuses of our Services and violation of our rules)
To pursue our legitimate interests to ensure our products and Services are safe and secure and to ensure they are used in accordance with our applicable Terms
To investigate and address violations of Terms
To detect, prevent and combat unlawful behaviour
To pursue our legitimate interests to ensure our products and Services are safe and secure and to ensure they are used in accordance with our applicable Terms
Inferences Drawn From Your Data
Usage Information
Usage Data
Data analysis, identifying usage trends, determining the effectiveness of our promotional campaigns
To pursue our legitimate interests to inform and improve our products and Services
You have a right to object to the processing of your personal information where that processing is carried out for our legitimate interests. Please note however that we may not be able to fulfill this request in all instances. You are able to request a copy of the legitimate interest assessment carried out by us.
Where we need to collect the abovementioned categories of Personal Data by virtue of a legal obligation or in light of a contract entered or to be entered into with you, and you do not provide this Personal Data when requested, we may not be able to comply with our legal obligations, provide you with a service or perform the contract we have or are trying to enter into with you. In such case, we may have to terminate our relationship with you.
KUMU’S SHARING OF PERSONAL DATA
We may share or disclose your Personal Data to the following third parties:
SERVICE PROVIDERS
We disclose Personal Data to service providers who work on our behalf, such as those that:
provide website hosting, maintenance, and security services
provide specific functionality
assist kumu in improving the kumu Services and developing new services and features
fulfill, distribute and process returns of products,  orders or contest prizes
conduct data analysis and report creation
process payments
prevent, detect, and investigate fraud or other prohibited actions
BUSINESS PARTNERS
Campaigns, Contests and Gaming Tournament partners.
When you participate in campaigns, challenges and competitions sponsored by our partners, we may disclose your personal data to them in accordance with the terms and conditions of the said campaign, challenge or competition.
Partner merchants.
When you purchase product from our kumu shop, we share your personal data with the shop merchants to fulfill your orders, process payment and delivery, return of your orders.
We may also share aggregated, anonymized data with our Business Partners and advertising clients, such as user segment statistics.
LAW AND PUBLIC INTEREST
We may disclose your Personal Data if we believe it is reasonably necessary to comply with law, regulation, legal process, or governmental requests such as court orders, subpoenas, or warrants in the manner allowed by law.
We may also disclose Personal Data when we believe, in good faith, that disclosure is appropriate or reasonably necessary to protect kumu from fraudulent, abusive, or unlawful uses; to investigate and defend ourselves against third-party claims or allegations; to protect the security or integrity of kumu; or to protect the rights, property, or safety of kumu, our users, or others.
AFFILIATES AND CHANGE OF OWNERSHIP
We may also disclose your Personal Data to kumu affiliates (companies controlled by, controlling, or under common control with kumu) and subsidiaries that are either subject to this Privacy Policy or implement standards that are at least as protective as those specified in this Privacy Policy.
Your Personal Data may also be transferred as part of a bankruptcy, merger, acquisition, reorganization, or sale of kumu assets if we are involved in such a transaction, including any evaluation of such a transaction.
HOW DOES KUMU OPERATE AND TRANSFER PERSONAL DATA GLOBALLY
Your information, including Personal Data, is processed at kumu’s operating offices and in any other places where the parties involved in the processing are located. It means that this information may be transferred to — and maintained on — computers/servers located outside of your state, province, country or other governmental jurisdiction where the data protection laws may differ than those from your jurisdiction.
kumu will take all steps reasonably necessary to ensure that your data is transferred securely and in accordance with this Privacy Policy, and applicable laws, and no transfer of your Personal Data will take place to an organization or a country unless there are adequate controls in place including with respect to the security of your Personal Data.
HOW LONG KUMU STORES YOUR PERSONAL DATA
kumu will retain your Personal Data only for as long as is necessary for the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy or as required or permitted by applicable laws. We will retain and use your Personal Data to the extent necessary to comply with our legal obligations (for example, if we are required to retain your data to comply with applicable laws), resolve disputes, and enforce our contractual agreements and policies.
We will cease to retain your Personal Data, or remove the means by which the data can be associated with you, as soon as it is reasonable to assume that such retention no longer serves the purpose for which the Personal Data was collected, and is no longer necessary for legal or business purposes.
HOW KUMU SECURES YOUR PERSONAL DATA
To safeguard your Personal Data from unauthorized access, collection, use, disclosure, copying, modification, disposal or similar risks, we have put in place reasonable and appropriate administrative, physical and technical measures.
You should be aware, however, that no method of transmission over the Internet or method of electronic storage is completely secure. Data security incidents and breaches can occur due to a variety of factors that cannot reasonably be prevented; therefore, our safeguards may not always be adequate to prevent all breaches of security.
YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS AND MANAGING YOUR PERSONAL DATA
CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
California residents may have specific rights with respect to the Personal Data we collect.  Click [here] for additional information about California residents’ rights and disclosures of our privacy practices as required under applicable California law.
PRIVACY RIGHTS
We generally rely on Personal Data provided by you (or your authorized representative). In order to ensure that your Personal Data is current, complete and accurate, please update us if there are changes to your Personal Data.
Subject to certain restrictions and limitations, you have certain rights in respect of your Personal Data. In particular, you have the following rights:
Right to access
– to receive a copy of your Personal Data. We will have to adequately verify your identity before any action can be taken;
Right to rectification
– to request for amendments to be made to your Personal Data where this is inaccurate or incorrect;
Right to restriction –
to ask that we restrict or suppress the processing of your Personal Data which means that whilst we are permitted to store the Personal Data we cannot otherwise process it;
Right to erasure
– to request for the deletion of your Personal Data that we hold. However, we may not always be able to delete your Personal Data for legal and regulatory reasons;
Right to object
– to object to the processing of your Personal Data which we carry out in reliance on our legitimate interests. In such instances, we will investigate to see if there is compelling reason for processing to continue. You cannot object to the processing which is a legal obligation or where we must process your Personal Data to satisfy a contract to which you are a party. Also, you can object to marketing communications at any time;
Right to withdraw you consent
– to withdraw your consent to the processing of your Personal Data at any time (where kumu is processing your personal information based on your consent). Please note that withdrawing your consent may prevent us from further providing all or part of our Services to you but does not affect the lawfulness of our processing of your Personal Data based on such consent before the withdrawal;
Right to data portability
– to receive certain Personal Data that you have provided to us, in a machine-readable form and/or that we transmit it to a third party with your express authorisation; and
Right to lodge a complaint
–to complain to the relevant supervisory authority if your privacy rights are violated, or if you have suffered as a result of unlawful processing of your Personal Data.
We may ask you for identifying information and attempt to match it to information that we maintain about you. If we can’t verify your identity or authority to make the request, and confirm the Personal Data belongs to you, we won’t be able to complete your request. We will notify you to inform you of this. You do not need to create an account with us to make a verifiable request. Personal data submitted in a verifiable request will only be used to confirm the requestor’s identity or permission to make the request.
If you would like to exercise your rights, please contact the Data Protection Officer using the contact details below.
To the extent permitted under applicable data protection laws, we may charge a reasonable fee for an access request to cover our administrative costs of providing the information in certain situations.  If so, we will inform you of the fee before we proceed with your request.
We will respond to your request as soon as reasonably possible and within thirty (30) calendar days. Should we not be able to respond to your request within thirty (30) days after receiving your request and where we are permitted to do so under applicable data protection laws, we will inform you in writing within thirty (30) days of the time by which we will be able to respond to your request.
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION OR ASSISTANCE
To protect your privacy and implement security, we will take reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting your request. We reserve the right to charge an appropriate fee for complying with your request where allowed by applicable law. There may be situations where we cannot grant your request especially if it jeopardizes the privacy of others, is frivolous or vexatious, or would be extremely impractical.
CHILDREN’S PRIVACY
kumu recognizes and values the importance of protecting the privacy of children, which we define as anyone under the age of thirteen. Our Services are not intended for or directed to children under the age of thirteen, and anyone under the age of thirteen are not permitted to use kumu. If we discover that we are processing data for such users (under the age of 13), we shall take reasonable steps to guarantee that their records are erased and data processing is ceased. Please inform us if you suspect we have Personal Data about or acquired from a child under the age of 13.
You must also be of legal age in your country to consent to the processing of your Personal Data (in some countries we may allow your parent or guardian to do so on your behalf).
ACCESSIBILITY
We are committed to ensuring that our communications are accessible to people with disabilities.  To make accessibility-related requests or report barriers, please contact us at dpo@kumu.ph.
CHANGES
We may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time without any prior notice. You are advised to review this Privacy Policy periodically for any changes. You may determine if any such revision has taken place by referring to the date on which this Privacy Policy was last updated.
If we make material changes to the Privacy Policy, we will let you know via email and/or a prominent notice on our Service, prior to the change becoming effective and update the date at the top of this Privacy Policy. Your continued use of our services constitutes your acknowledgement and acceptance of such changes.
CONTACT
You may contact our Data Protection Officer if you have any inquiries or feedback on our Personal Data protection policies and procedures, or if you wish to make any request, in the following manner:
Data Protection Officer
dpo@kumu.ph, 6F Robinsons Cybergate Tower 3, Pioneer St., Mandaluyong City, Philippines.
ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES FOR CERTAIN JURISDICTIONS
CALIFORNIA PRIVACY NOTICE
This California Privacy Notice(“California Notice” or “Notice”) supplements the Privacy Policy above and applies to California residents.  It describes our data collection practices with respect to the Personal Data we collect about California residents when they use our Services, communicate to us and engage with us offline.  The Notice also describes rights California residents have with respect to the Personal Data we collect.
Terms that are defined in the Privacy Policy have the same meaning when used in this California Notice.
Categories of Personal Data We Collect and Have Collected in the Past 12 Months – Sources and Categories
In the 12 months preceding the date of this California Notice, we may have collected your Personal Data when you download our app, create an account, stream through our Services, participate in our campaigns and challenges, post klips, use our chat services, purchase coins and share virtual gifts through our Services, contact us (including via social media), participate in our surveys and events, purchase a product in our kumu shop, or otherwise interact with us by using our Services.  We will continue to collect Personal Data from the same sources.
In the  twelve (12) months prior to the date of this Notice, we have collected, and will continue to collect, the following categories of Personal Data:
Personal Identifiers
: Name, physical address, phone number, unique personal identifier, IP address, device ID, email address, in-game username, account name and password, [social media account names], governmental ID information
Financial information:
Bank account information, credit, debit, or other payment card information
Protected class information
: Gender, age range
Commercial information:
Records of products or Services purchased or consumed
Internet or other electronic network activity:
Data about your activities on and use of our Services, app launches inside our Services, browser history, search history, and product engagement, information regarding your interaction with our Services and our advertisements, device and browser type
Audio and visual information:
Audio, videos, images, and other information uploaded, viewed ,shared and downloaded on and from the Services; interactions and exchanges with other users (e.g., chat, stream)
Inferences drawn from any of the Personal Data identified above
.
Purposes for Collection of Personal Data
We use your Personal Data for the following purposes to provide Services to you; to perform our obligations in the course of or in connection with our Services requested by you; to allow you to leave comments on content and engage in campaigns or rewards programs; to verify your identity and respond to, handle, and process queries, requests, applications, complaints, and feedback from you; to process payment or credit transactions; to provide you with news, special offers and general information about our Services.
We also use your Personal Data to comply with any applicable laws, regulations, codes of practice, guidelines, or rules, or to assist in law enforcement and investigations conducted by any governmental and/or regulatory authority. This includes, but is not limited to, as applicable, disclosure of Personal Data of the winners of DTI registered campaigns to Philippines’ Department of Trade and Industry, and processing your Personal Data in accordance to the regulatory requirements of Anti-Money Laundering Council and Bangko Sentral ng Pilipinas.
Additionally, we use Personal Data to monitor or improve our Services; for internal business analysis; to prevent fraud, activities that violate our Terms of Service or that are illegal; and to protect our rights and the rights and safety of our users or others.
Categories of Personal Data Disclosed for Business Purpose in Past 12 Months
Categories of Consumers’ Personal Data
Categories of Third Parties With Which We Shared Personal Data for a Business Purpose
Personal Identifiers: Name, physical address, phone number, unique personal identifier, IP address, device ID, email address, in-game username, account name and password, [social media account names], governmental ID information
Service providers that
assist us in operating, analyzing, and displaying content on our website; provide analytics information; advertise or market our products; provide website hosting, webcast and teleconference services; provide legal and accounting services.
Financial information: Bank account information, credit, debit, or other payment card information
Service providers that provide payment processing services
Commercial information:
Records of products or Services purchased or consumed
Service providers that assist kumu in improving the kumu Services and developing new services and features; fulfill and/or distribute orders or contest prizes; and conduct data analysis and report creation
Internet or other electronic network activity:
Data about your activities on and use of our Services, app launches inside our Services, browser history, search history, and product engagement, information regarding your interaction with our Services and our advertisements, device and browser type
Service providers that provide data security services and cloud-based data storage; host our website and assist with other IT-related functions; advertise and market our products; and provide analytics information
Additional Information About How We May Disclose Personal Data
We may also disclose your Personal Data as required or permitted by law, to comply with a subpoena or similar legal process or government request, or when we believe in good faith that disclosure is legally required or otherwise necessary to protect our rights and property or the rights, property or safety of others, including to law enforcement agencies, and judicial and regulatory authorities. We may also share your Personal Data with third parties to help detect and protect against fraud or data security vulnerabilities.  And we may transfer your Personal Data to a third party in the event of an actual or contemplated sale, merger, reorganization of our entity or other restructuring.
Rights Regarding Personal Data
Your Right To Request Disclosure of Information We Collect and Share About You
We are committed to ensuring that you know what Personal Data we collect. To that end, you can ask us for any or all of following types of information regarding the Personal Data we have collected about you in the 12 months prior to our receipt of your request:
Specific pieces of Personal Data we have collected about you;
Categories of Personal Data we have collected about you;
Categories of sources from which such Personal Data was collected;
Categories of Personal Data that the business sold or disclosed for a business purpose about the consumer;
Categories of third parties to whom the Personal Data was sold or disclosed for a business purpose; and
The business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling your Personal Data.
Your Right To Request Deletion of Personal Data We Have Collected About You
Upon your request, we will delete the Personal Data we have collected about you, except for situations where the CCPA authorizes us to retain specific information, including when it is necessary for us to provide you with a good or service that you requested; perform a contract we entered into with you; maintain the functionality or security of our systems; or comply with or exercise rights provided by the law.  The law also permits us to retain specific information for our exclusively internal use, but only in ways that are compatible with the context in which you provided the information to us or that are reasonably aligned with your expectations based on your relationship with us.  We will act on your deletion request within the timeframes set forth below.
Your Right to Ask Us Not to Sell Personal Data We Have Collected About You
You can direct us not to sell your Personal Data by submitting an opt-out request through our Data Request Form , or by contacting us.  We will act on your request within the timeframes set forth below.
Exercising Your Rights and How We Will Respond
To exercise any of the rights above, or to ask a question, contact us, complete and submit our Data Request Form or use the contact details set out at the end of this California Notice .
For requests for access or deletion, we will first acknowledge receipt of your request within 10 business days of receipt of your request.  We provide a substantive response to your request as soon as we can, generally within 45 days from when we receive your request, although we may be allowed to take longer to process your request under certain circumstances.  If we expect your request is going to take us longer than normal to fulfill, we will let you know.
For requests to stop the sale of your Personal Data, we will comply no later than 15 business days after receipt of your request.
We usually act on requests and provide information free of charge, but we may charge a reasonable fee to cover our administrative costs of providing the information in certain situations.  In some cases, the law may allow us to refuse to act on certain requests.  When this is the case, we will endeavor to provide you with an explanation as to why.
Verification of Identity – Access or Deletion Requests
We will ask you for identifying information and attempt to match it to information that we maintain about you.
If we are unable to verify your identity with the degree of certainty required, we will not be able to respond to your request.  We will notify you to explain the basis of the denial.
Ensuring Veracity of Opt-Out Requests
If we have a good-faith, reasonable belief that a request to opt-out of the sale of Personal Data is fraudulent, we may deny the request.  Should this occur, we will inform you and explain why we believe the request is fraudulent.
Authorized Agents
You may designate an agent to submit requests on your behalf.  The agent must be a natural person or a business entity that is registered with the California Secretary of State.
If you would like to designate an agent to act on your behalf, you and the agent will need to comply with our verification process:
Requests to Know or Delete Personal Data:
If the agent submits requests to access, know or delete your Personal Data, the agent will need to provide us with your signed permission indicating the agent has been authorized to submit the opt-out request on your behalf.  We will also require that you verify your identity directly with us or confirm with us that you provided the agent with permission to submit the request.
Requests to Opt Out of Sale:
If the agent submits a request to opt out of the sale of your Personal Data, the agent will need to provide us with your signed permission indicating the agent has been authorized to submit the opt-out request on your behalf.
Please note that this subsection does not apply when an agent is authorized to act on your behalf pursuant to a valid power of attorney.  Any such requests will be processed in accordance with California law pertaining to powers of attorney.
Requests for Household Information
There may be some types of Personal Data that can be associated with a household (a group of people living together in a single dwelling).  Requests for access or deletion of household Personal Data must be made by each member of the household.  To the extent we collect household information and requests are made pertaining specifically to such information, before responding to a request, we will verify the identity of each member of the household using the verification criteria explained above and will also verify that each household member is currently a member of the household.
No discrimination for exercise of CCPA rights
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your CCPA rights. Unless the CCPA allows it, we will not deny your use of our services.
California “Shine the Light” disclosure
In certain circumstances under the California “Shine the Light” law, residents of California have the right to opt out of the sharing of certain categories of Personal Data (as defined in the Shine the Light statute) with third parties for their direct marketing purposes. kumu does not share your Personal Data to third parties for the purpose of direct marketing.
Do Not Track
Some browsers have a “do not track” feature that lets you tell websites that you do not want to have your online activities tracked.  At this time, our websites do not respond to browsers’ do not track signals.
Contact information
For questions about our U.S. state data privacy practices, including about how to exercise your data access rights under California law, please contact us at
dpo@kumu.ph
MORE RESOURCES
Terms of Use
Kumunity Guidelines
Recruitment Privacy Policy
Old Terms of Use
Old Privacy Policy
Enter your Mobile Number:
Send
Sub-policy 3
https://sites.google.com/kumu.ph/recruitmentprivacypolicy/home:
Sign in
with your Google Account. This account will be available to other Google apps in the browser.
Email or phone
Forgot email?
Type the text you hear or see
Not your computer? Use Guest mode to sign in privately.
Learn more about using Guest mode
Next
Create account
For my personal use
For my child
For work or my business
Sign in with your Google Account. This account will be available to other Google apps in the browser.